Maine, session 132, LD1689.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4273 is enacted to read:
§4273. Elementary schools to include area for preschool or child care
A public elementary school constructed after October 1, 2025 must include an area that
may be used for preschool instruction or child care.
Sec. 2. Department of Education to revise essential programs and services
funding formula. The Department of Education shall revise the essential programs and
services funding formula under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, chapter 606-B
regarding the method it uses to fund preschool instruction to use a method similar to that
used for funding kindergarten instruction in order to provide incentives to school
administrative units to provide full-day preschool instruction.
Sec. 3. Department of Education to study early childhood education
credentialing procedures and policies. The Department of Education shall study early
childhood educator and provider credentialing procedures and policies as they relate to
nursery school teachers, preschool teachers, kindergarten teachers and elementary school
teachers. The department shall identify barriers to the expansion of preschool programs in
this State and recommend improvements to early childhood educator and provider
credentialing procedures and policies that would provide greater flexibility in credentialing
and facilitate the expansion of preschool programs by school administrative units.
Sec. 4. Department of Health and Human Services to study standards and
rules for early childhood educators and providers. The Department of Health and
Human Services, in collaboration with the Department of Education and stakeholders, shall
study the standards and rules for early childhood educators and providers in order to better
align standards and rules across all early childhood educators and providers and reduce
barriers to the expansion of preschool programs and the provision of early childhood
education services.
Sec. 5. Reports. The Department of Education and the Department of Health and
Human Services shall each report their findings under sections 3 and 4, including any
suggested legislation, to the Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs
and the Joint Standing Committee on Health and Human Services no later than December
3, 2025. The Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs and the Joint
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services may each report out legislation based
on the reports to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Early Childhood Infrastructure Z315
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to establish 4 Education Specialist II positions to serve
as regional coordinators to work with schools and potential partners in different regions of
the State that are looking to start or expand public preschool programs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Page 1 - 132LR0069(01)

Personal Services $342,690 $463,597
All Other $37,312 $37,312
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $380,002 $500,909
Early Childhood Infrastructure Z315
Initiative: Provides one-time funds in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 for a preschool
expansion grant program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,000 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,000,000 $2,000,000
128
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $2,380,002 $2,500,909
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,380,002 $2,500,909